California, session 20252026, AB492.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11834.09 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:11834.09. (a) (1) The department may issue a single license to operate an alcohol or other drug recovery or treatment facility upon receipt of a completed written application, fire clearance, and licensing fee subject to the department’s review and determination that the applicant can comply with this chapter and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.(2) Whenever the department issues a license pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall concurrently provide written notification of the issuance of the license to the city in which the facility is located. If the facility is located within an unincorporated area, the notice shall instead be provided to the county. The notice shall include the name and mailing address of the licensee and the location of the facility.(b) Failure to submit a completed written application, fire clearance, and payment of the required licensing fee in a timely manner shall result in termination of the department’s licensure review and shall require submission of a new application by the applicant.(c) Failure of the applicant to demonstrate the ability to comply with this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter shall result in departmental denial of the application for licensure.(d) Initial licenses for new facilities shall be provisional for one year. During the term of the provisional license, the department may revoke the license for good cause. For the purposes of this section, “good cause” means failure to operate in compliance with this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. A licensee may not reapply for an initial license for five years following a revocation of a provisional license.(e) On or before July 1, 2022, the department shall adopt regulations to implement this section in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of provider bulletins, written guidelines, or similar instructions, until regulations are adopted.